zh-TW: 藝術/手作工具尖端樣式: 球型; 鑿口型; 針尖型; 圓頭型; 錐形頭; 其他
el: Στυλ μύτης εργαλείου τέχνης/χειροτεχνίας: Σφαίρα; Μύτη τύπου σμίλης; Μύτη βελόνας; Στρογγυλεμένη μύτη; Κωνική μύτη; Άλλο
es: Estilo de punta de herramienta de arte/manualidades: Bola; Punta de cincel; Punta de aguja; Punta redondeada; Punta cónica; Otro
ko: 미술/공예 도구 촉 스타일: 볼; 치즐 팁; 니들 포인트; 둥근 팁; 테이퍼드 팁; 기타
hr-HR: Stil vrha alata za umjetnost/rukotvorine: Kuglica; Dlijeto; Igla; Zaobljeni vrh; Suženi vrh; Ostalo
nb: Kunst-/Craft tuppstil: Kule; Meiselspiss; Nålespiss; Avrundet spiss; Konisk spiss; Annet
it: Stile di punta per strumenti artistici/Craft: A sfera; A scalpello; Ad ago; Punta arrotondata; Punta affusolata; Altro
cs: Tvar hrotu uměleckých/řemeslných nástrojů: Kulička; Zkosený hrot; Jehlový hrot; Zakulacený hrot; Zúžený hrot; Ostatní
zh-CN: 手工艺工具尖端样式: 圆头; 凿形头; 针管头; 圆角头; 锥形头; 其他
ja: アート／Craftツールチップスタイル: ボール; チゼルチップ; ニードルポイント; ラウンドチップ; テーパーチップ; その他
en: Art/Crafting tool tip style: Ball; Chisel tip; Needle point; Rounded tip; Tapered tip; Other
pt-PT: Estilo de ponta de ferramenta para artes e manualidades: Bola; Ponta cinzelada; Ponta de agulha; Ponta arredondada; Ponta cónica; Outros
bg-BG: Стил на върха на инструмента за изкуство/занаяти: Сферичен; Скосен връх; Иглен връх; Заоблен връх; Заострен връх; Друго
fr: Style de pointe d’outil d’art ou de loisirs créatifs: Bille; Pointe biseautée; Pointe d’aiguille; Pointe arrondie; Pointe effilée; Autre
pt-BR: Estilo de ponta de ferramenta para artes/artesanato: Esfera; Ponta chanfrada; Ponta de agulha; Ponta arredondada; Ponta cônica; Outro
vi: Kiểu đầu dụng cụ nghệ thuật/thủ công: Bi; Đầu đục; Đầu kim; Đầu tròn; Đầu nhọn dần; Khác
sl-SI: Slog konice orodja za umetnost/ustvarjanje: Kroglasta; Konica v obliki dleta; Iglasta konica; Zaobljena konica; Koničasta konica; Drugo
nl: Puntstijl voor kunst-/hobbygereedschap: Kogel; Beitelpunt; Naaldpunt; Ronde punt; Taps toelopende punt; Overige
de: Spitzenstil für Kunst-/Bastelwerkzeuge: Kugel; Meißelspitze; Nadelspitze; Abgerundete Spitze; Verjüngte Spitze; Sonstige
da: Tip til kunst- og håndværksværktøjer: Kugle; Mejselspids; Nålespids; Afrundet spids; Tilspidset spids; Andet
fi: Taide-/käsityökärjen malli: Pallo; Talttakärki; Neulankärki; Pyöristetty kärki; Kaventuva kärki; Muu
ru: Тип рабочего наконечника для художественных и рукодельных инструментов: Шариковый; Скошенный; Игольчатый; Закругленный; Заостренный; Другое
th: รูปแบบปลายหัวเครื่องมือศิลปะ/งานประดิษฐ์: หัวบอล; หัวตัด; หัวเข็ม; หัวมน; หัวเรียว; อื่นๆ
tr: Sanat/el işi alet ucu stili: Bilye; Kesik uç; İğne uç; Yuvarlatılmış uç; Konik uç; Diğer
sv: Verktygsspets för pyssel: Kula; Mejselspets; Nålspets; Rundad spets; Avsmalnande spets; Annat
pl: Styl końcówki narzędzia artystycznego/rękodzielniczego: Kulkowa; Ścięta; Igłowa; Zaokrąglona; Stożkowa; Inne
hu: Művészeti/kézműves eszköz hegyének stílusa: Gömb; Vésőhegy; Tűhegy; Lekerekített hegy; Kúpos hegy; Egyéb
ro-RO: Stilul vârfului instrumentului pentru artă/meșteșug: Bilă; Vârf tip daltă; Vârf de ac; Vârf rotunjit; Vârf conic; Altele
lt-LT: Meno / rankdarbių įrankio antgalio tipas: Rutulinis; Kirstas antgalis; Adatinis antgalis; Apvalus antgalis; Smailėjantis antgalis; Kita
sk-SK: Štýl hrotu nástroja pre umenie/remeslá: Guľôčka; Zrezaný hrot; Ihlový hrot; Zaoblený hrot; Zúžený hrot; Iné